Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

There is hereby appropriated to the Office of Juvenile Affairs
from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the Statewide
Recovery Fund of the State Treasury created in Section 255 of Title
62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of Ten Million Dollars
($10,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary due to
increase costs of the project funded in Section 1 of Enrolled Senate
Bill No. 19 of the 2nd Extraordinary Session of the 58th Oklahoma
Legislature. Such funds shall be utilized in a manner consistent
with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a Statewide
Recovery Special Account for the Office of Juvenile Affairs for each
appropriation section of this act. The duration of such accounts
shall continue for the period of time that monies related to the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 are being budgeted, expended, or
managed in the state. The ending of such period shall be determined
by the State Treasurer, and shall result in the closing of such
accounts as a matter of law. Such accounts shall be continuing
accounts as otherwise provided in this section, not subject to
fiscal year limitations, and shall exclusively consist of monies
related to the relevant appropriations made in this act and as
otherwise directed by law. All monies deposited to the credit of
such accounts are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Office of Juvenile Affairs in accordance with the
provisions of this act. Expenditures from such accounts shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. The Office of Juvenile Affairs is authorized to request in
writing that the monies appropriated by the provisions of this act
be deposited or transferred to the accounts created pursuant to
subsection A of this section. No later than seven (7) calendar days
from the date of such request, the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall comply with such request
and verify to the requesting agency that such deposit or transfer
has been completed.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 2790 Page 2

The Office of Juvenile Affairs may enter into memorandums of
understanding with other agencies of the State of Oklahoma for the
auditing, documentation, evaluation, implementation, oversight,
reporting, and management of funds and associated efforts related to
the appropriations made in this act; provided, no such memorandum of
understanding shall require or include, as an option or condition,
the direct or practical transfer or relinquishment of control by the
agency appropriated such funds to budget, expend, allocate, and
request the distribution of the funds appropriated by this act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Office of Juvenile Affairs may promulgate rules, utilize
existing rules, establish procedures, and utilize existing
procedures to implement the provisions of this act, provided such
rules and procedures do not conflict with or impede the provisions
of this act.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall retain no more than two
percent (2%) of the funds appropriated by this act to reimburse:
1. Costs incurred by the Office of Juvenile Affairs; or
2. Costs incurred on the agency's behalf, associated with the
administration of the appropriated funds and programming required by
the Office of Juvenile Affairs under the provisions of this act;
provided, no funds shall be retained that would be disallowable
under the provisions of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall:
1. Submit to the chairs of the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding, or any successor Oklahoma House of Representatives
or Oklahoma State Senate legislative committee or joint committee,
as designated by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate:
ENR. H. B. NO. 2790 Page 3

a. a written or electronic quarterly report detailing the
budgeting, expenditure, and management of all monies
appropriated in this act, and
b. a copy of all memorandums of understanding and
contracts with third parties entered into by the
Office of Juvenile Affairs to facilitate, assist, or
administer powers and duties provided to the
Department under the provisions of this act; and
2. At the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding's request,
appear before the Joint Committee no later than six (6) months after
the effective date of this act, and as otherwise requested by the
Joint Committee, to provide a status update regarding the
implementation of the provisions of this act.
B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall remain
applicable for the period of time that monies appropriated under
this act are being budgeted, expended, or managed in the state. The
ending of such period shall be determined by the State Treasurer,
and shall be reported to the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2790 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2790 Page 5